Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.023, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Possession crimes. (a) A person is guilty of controlled substance crime in the third degree if: (1) on one or more occasions within a 90-day period the person unlawfully possesses one or more mixtures of a total weight of ten grams or more containing a narcotic drug other than heroin or fentanyl; (2) on one or more occasions within a 90-day period the person unlawfully possesses one or more mixtures of: (i) a total weight of three grams or more containing heroin; or (ii) a total weight of five grams or more, or 25 dosage units or more, containing fentanyl; (3) on one or more occasions within a 90-day period the person unlawfully possesses one or more mixtures containing a narcotic drug other than heroin or fentanyl, it is packaged in dosage units, and equals 50 or more dosage units; (4) on one or more occasions within a 90-day period the person unlawfully possesses any amount of a schedule I or II narcotic drug or five or more dosage units of lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, or 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine in a school zone, a park zone, a public housing zone, or a drug treatment facilitynew text begin , except a residual amount contained in drug paraphernalia, a hypodermic syringe or needle or any instrument or implement that can be adapted for subcutaneous injection, or a small plastic bag of the type commonly used to store controlled substances in an amount for personal usenew text end ; (5) on one or more occasions within a 90-day period the person unlawfully possesses: (i) more than ten kilograms of cannabis flower; (ii) more than two kilograms of cannabis concentrate; or (iii) edible cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp-derived consumer products, or any combination of those infused with more than 200 grams of tetrahydrocannabinol; or (6) the person unlawfully possesses one or more mixtures containing methamphetamine or amphetamine in a school zone, a park zone, a public housing zone, or a drug treatment facilitynew text begin , except a residual amount contained in drug paraphernalia, a hypodermic syringe or needle or any instrument or implement that can be adapted for subcutaneous injection, or a small plastic bag of the type commonly used to store controlled substances in an amount for personal usenew text end . (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, the weight of fluid used in a water pipe may not be considered in measuring the weight of a mixture except in cases where the mixture contains four or more fluid ounces of fluid. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.025, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Possession and other crimes. A person is guilty of controlled substance crime in the fifth degree and upon conviction may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 4 if: (1) the person unlawfully possesses one or more mixtures containing a controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, III, or IV, exceptnew text begin : (i)new text end cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer productsnew text begin ;new text end ornew text begin (ii)new text end a residual amount of one or more mixtures of controlled substances contained in drug paraphernalianew text begin , a hypodermic syringe or needle or any instrument or implement that can be adapted for subcutaneous injection, or a small plastic bag of the type commonly used to store controlled substances in an amount for personal usenew text end ; or (2) the person procures, attempts to procure, possesses, or has control over a controlled substance by any of the following means: (i) fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or subterfuge; (ii) using a false name or giving false credit; or (iii) falsely assuming the title of, or falsely representing any person to be, a manufacturer, wholesaler, pharmacist, physician, doctor of osteopathic medicine licensed to practice medicine, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, or other authorized person for the purpose of obtaining a controlled substance.